src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N_UMĀRZ !!≈ * **@CODE@** umārz:umār 226
 NMN_UMĀRZ  ;
!LEXICON N_UMĀRZ-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ umārz:umār 226
! NMN_UMĀRZ-PL   ;

!LEXICON N_DULLÕNZ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ dullõnz:dullõn 227
!	N_DULLÕNZ-SG	  ;
!	N_DULLÕNZ-PL	  ;
!LEXICON N_DULLÕNZ-SG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ dullõnz:dullõn 227
! NMN_DULLÕNZ-SG	  ;
!LEXICON N_DULLÕNZ-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ dullõnz:dullõn 227
! NMN_DULLÕNZ-PL	  ;

LEXICON N_AʼBBÕNZ !!≈ * **@CODE@** aʼbbõnz:aʼbbõn 228
	N_AʼBBÕNZ-SG	;
	N_AʼBBÕNZ-PL	;
LEXICON N_AʼBBÕNZ-SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** aʼbbõnz:aʼbbõn 228
 NMN_AʼBBÕNZ-SG       ;
LEXICON N_AʼBBÕNZ-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** aʼbbõnz:aʼbbõn 228
 NMN_AʼBBÕNZ-PL       ;

LEXICON N_AŅGÕRZ !!≈ * **@CODE@** : aņgõrz:aņgõr 229
 NMN_AŅGÕRZ  ;
LEXICON N_AŅGÕRZ-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** : aņgõrz:aņgõr 229
     NMN_AŅGÕRZ-PL    ;

LEXICON N_KAʼGGÕRZ !!≈ * **@CODE@** kaʼggõrz:kaʼggõr 230
 NMN_KAʼGGÕRZ   ;
!LEXICON N_KAʼGGÕRZ-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ kaʼggõrz:kaʼggõr 230
! NMN_KAʼGGÕRZ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_PǞGIŅŽ !!≈ * **@CODE@** pǟgiņž:pǟgiņ 231
 NMN_PǞGIŅŽ      ;
!LEXICON N_PǞGIŅŽ-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ pǟgiņž:pǟgiņ 231
! NMN_PǞGIŅŽ-PL      ;

LEXICON N_VAGĀŖ !!≈ * **@CODE@** vagāŗ:vagār 232
 NMN_VAGĀŖ  ;
!LEXICON N_VAGĀŖ-SG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ vagāŗ:vagār 232
! NMN_VAGĀŖ-SG  ;
!LEXICON N_VAGĀŖ-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ vagāŗ:vagār 232
! NMN_VAGĀŖ-PL  ;

LEXICON N_TIDĀR !!≈ * **@CODE@** tidār:tidār 233
 	NMN_TIDĀR  ;
LEXICON N_TIDĀR-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** tidār:tidār 233
     NMN_TIDĀR-PL   ;

LEXICON N_PĒGAL !!≈ * **@CODE@** pēgal:pēgal 234
	N_TIDĀR	;
LEXICON N_PĒGAL-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** pēgal:pēgal 234
        N_TIDĀR-PL  ;

LEXICON N_APPÕN !!≈ * **@CODE@** appõn:appõn 235
        N_APPÕN-SG ;
        N_APPÕN-PL ;
LEXICON N_APPÕN-SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** appõn:appõn 235
 NMN_APPÕN-SG ;
LEXICON N_APPÕN-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** appõn:appõn 235
        NMN_APPÕN-PL  ;

LEXICON N_ǬʼRÕN !!≈ * **@CODE@** ǭʼrõn:ǭrõn 236
        NMN_ǬʼRÕN-SG ;
        NMN_ǬʼRÕN-PL ;
LEXICON N_ǬʼRÕN-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** ǭʼrõn:ǭrõn 236
        N_ǬʼRÕN-PL  ;

LEXICON N_KĪNDÕR !!≈ * **@CODE@** kīndõr:kīndõr 237
        N_KĪNDÕR-SG  ;
        N_KĪNDÕR-PL  ;

LEXICON N_KĪNDÕR-SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** kīndõr:kīndõr 237
        NMN_KĪNDÕR-SG  ;
LEXICON N_KĪNDÕR-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** kīndõr:kīndõr 237
        NMN_KĪNDÕR-PL  ;

LEXICON N_BÄʼZMÕR !!≈ * **@CODE@** bäʼzmõr:bäʼzmõr 238
	N_BÄʼZMÕR-SG  ;
	N_BÄʼZMÕR-PL  ;
LEXICON N_BÄʼZMÕR-SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** bäʼzmõr:bäʼzmõr 238
 NMN_BÄʼZMÕR-SG  ;
LEXICON N_BÄʼZMÕR-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** bäʼzmõr:bäʼzmõr 238
 NMN_BÄʼZMÕR-PL  ;

LEXICON N_TARĪĻ !!≈ * **@CODE@** tarīļ:tarīļ 239
 NMN_TARĪĻ  ;
LEXICON N_TARĪĻ-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** tarīļ:tarīļ 239
 NMN_TARĪĻ-PL  ;

LEXICON N_ĀNKAŖ !!≈ * **@CODE@** ānkaŗ:ānkaŗ 240
	N_TARĪĻ	;
LEXICON N_ĀNKAŖ-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** ānkaŗ:ānkaŗ 240
	N_TARĪĻ-PL ;

LEXICON N_VIRPÕĻ !!≈ * **@CODE@** virpõļ:virpõļ 241
        NMN_VIRPÕĻ ;
!LEXICON N_VIRPÕĻ-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ virpõļ:virpõļ 241
!        N_TARĪĻ-PL ;

LEXICON N_ǬʼBIĻ !!≈ * **@CODE@** ǭʼbiļ:ǭbiļ 242
        NMN_ǬʼBIĻ ;
LEXICON N_ǬʼBIĻ-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** ǭʼbiļ:ǭbiļ 242
	NMN_ǬʼBIĻ-PL ;

LEXICON N_GOLĀTÕKS !!≈ * **@CODE@** golātõks:golātõks 244 found in Liv-est-lat dictionary
 N_KĒRATÕKS ; !!




!! ## Nominal inflection
!! Inflection lexica
LEXICON NMN_PŪ !!≈ * **@CODE@** pū:pū 12
!!≈ * Yaml: **N-puu**
!! Stem change: None
	NMN_PŪ-SG	;
	NMN_PŪ-PL	;

LEXICON NMN_PŪ-SG
 	SG-DAT_n ;
 	SG-ELA/INE_stõ ;
 	SG-GEN ;
 	SG-ILL_ʼzõ ;
! SG-INE ;
  	SG-INS_kõks ;
     	SG-NOM  ;
 	SG-PAR_dõ ;

LEXICON NMN_PŪ-PL
 PL-INS_DKÕKS-STEM ;
 PL-ELA/INE_šti ;
 PL-ILL_ʼži ;
 PL-PAR_ḑi ;

LEXICON NMN_RǬʼ
!! 13
!! * Yaml: **N-rooq**
!! Stem	change:	None
	NMN_RǬʼ-SG ;
	NMN_RǬʼ-PL ;

LEXICON  NMN_RǬʼ-SG
        SG-DAT_n ;
        SG-ELA/INE_stõ ;
        SG-GEN ;
        SG-ILL_zõ ;
! SG-INE ;
        SG-INS_kõks ;
        SG-NOM  ;
        SG-PAR_dõ ;

LEXICON NMN_RǬʼ-PL
	PL-INS_DKÕKS-STEM ;
	PL-ELA/INE_šti ;
	PL-ILL_ži ;
! 	PL-INE ;
 	PL-PAR_ḑi ;

LEXICON NMN_PǞ
!! 14
!!≈ * Yaml: **N-paeae**
!! Stem	change:	Yes 
!!  Vowel raising ǟ:ē +Pl +Ela/+Ill/+Par
!! Stød: Yes
	NMN_PǞ-SG	;
	NMN_PǞ-PL	;

LEXICON NMN_PǞ-SG
        SG-DAT_n ;
        SG-ELA/INE_stõ ;
        SG-GEN ;
        SG-ILL_ʼzõ ;
        SG-INS_kõks ;
        SG-NOM  ;
        SG-PAR_dõ ;

LEXICON NMN_PǞ-PL
        PL-INS_DKÕKS-STEM ;
:%^VOWRaise        PL-ELA/INE_šti ;
:%^VOWRaise        PL-ILL_ʼži ;
:%^VOWRaise        PL-PAR_ḑi ;

LEXICON NMN_TĪE !!≈ * **@CODE@** tīe:tīʼe
!! 15
!!≈ * Yaml: **N-paeae**
!! Stem change: Yes
!!  Vowel lowering īe:ē +Pl +Ela/+Ill/+Par
!! Stød: Yes
	NMN_TĪE-SG	;
	NMN_TĪE-PL	;
LEXICON NMN_TĪE-SG
:%^StodRM        SG-DAT_n ;
:%^StodRM        SG-ELA/INE_stõ ;
:%^StodRM        SG-GEN ;
        SG-ILL_zõ ; !!≈ * **@CODE@** 2014.12.12 Stød loss problem,
!! 		    	should be tīʼezõ
:%^StodRM        SG-INS_kõks ;
:%^StodRM        SG-NOM  ;
:%^StodRM        SG-PAR_dõ ;

LEXICON NMN_TĪE-PL
:%^StodRM        PL-INS_DKÕKS-STEM ;
:%^StodRM        PL-ELA/INE_šti ; !! tiēšti
:        PL-ILL_ži ;
:%^StodRM        PL-PAR_ḑi ;

LEXICON NMN_BRĪ
!! 16
!!≈ * Yaml: **N-mai**
!! Stem change: None
	NMN_BRĪ-PL	;
        SG-DAT_õn ;
        SG-ELA/INE_õst ;
	SG-GEN ;
        SG-ILL_õ ;
        SG-INS_õks ;
        SG-NOM  ;
	SG-PAR_õ ;

LEXICON NMN_BRĪ-PL
        PL-INS_DÕKS-STEM ;
        PL-ELA/INE_šti ;
        PL-ILL_ži ;
	PL-PAR_ḑi ;

LEXICON NMN_TEI  !!≈ * **@CODE@** tei:tei
!! 17
!!≈ * Yaml: **N-tei** Pass 2014.12.12
!! Stem change: Yes 
!!  Vowel change: ei:ē
	NMN_TEI-SG	;
	NMN_TEI-PL	;

LEXICON NMN_TEI-SG
        SG-DAT_õn ;
        SG-ELA/INE_õst ;
	SG-GEN ;
        SG-ILL_õ ;
        SG-INS_õks ;
        SG-NOM  ;
	SG-PAR_õ ;

LEXICON NMN_TEI-PL
        PL-INS_DÕKS-STEM ;
:%^VowsLI1        PL-ELA/INE_šti ;
:%^VowsLI1        PL-ILL_ži ;
:%^VowsLI1	PL-PAR_ḑi ;

LEXICON NMN_KUŖĒ !!≈ * **@CODE@** kuŗē:kuʼŗ
!! 18
!!≈ * Yaml: **N-kurree??**
!! kuŗē:kuʼŗ
	NMN_KUŖĒ-SG	;
	NMN_KUŖĒ-PL	;

LEXICON NMN_KUŖĒ-SG
:%^StodRMē        SG-DAT_n ;
:%^StodRMē        SG-ELA/INE_st ;
:%^StodRMē        SG-GEN ;
:%^Stress2to1    SG-ILL_ZERO ;
!! SG-INE ;
:%^StodRM        SG-INS_ks ;
:%^StodRM        SG-NOM  ;
:%^Stress2to1    SG-PAR_ZERO ;

LEXICON NMN_KUŖĒ-PL
:%^StodRM        PL-INS_DÕKS-STEM ;
:%^VowsRM        PL-ELA/INE_šti ;
:%^VowsRM        PL-ILL_ži ;
:%^VowsRM        PL-PAR_ḑi ;

!! 18
LEXICON NMN_KALĀ !!≈ * **@CODE@** kalā:kaʼl
!!≈ * Yaml: **N-kalaa** Pass: 2014.12.12
!! Stem change: Yes
!!   Consonant lengthening
!!   Consonant palatalization
!!   Vowel change in 2nd syllable ā:õ/0
!! Stød: Yes
	NMN_KALĀ-SG	;
	NMN_KALĀ-PL	;

LEXICON NMN_KALĀ-SG
:%^StodRMā        SG-DAT_n ;
:%^StodRMā        SG-ELA/INE_st ;
:%^StodRMā        SG-GEN ;
:%{XC%}%>õ    SG-ILL_ZERO ;
:%^StodRMā        SG-INS_ks ;
:%^StodRMā        SG-NOM  ;
:%{XC%}%>õ    SG-PAR_ZERO ;

LEXICON NMN_KALĀ-PL
:%^StodRMā        PL-INS_DÕKS-STEM ;
:%^PalatalizeLeft        PL-ELA/INE_šti ;
:%^PalatalizeLeft        PL-ILL_ži ;
:%^PalatalizeLeft        PL-PAR_ḑi ;

!! 18a
LEXICON NMN_IRĒ !!≈ * **@CODE@** irē:iʼr
!!≈ * Yaml: **N-kalaa** Pass: 2014.12.12
!! Stem change: Yes
!!   Consonant lengthening
!!   Consonant palatalization
!!   Vowel change in 2nd syllable ā:õ/0
!! Stød: Yes
	NMN_IRĒ-SG	;
	NMN_IRĒ-PL	;

LEXICON NMN_IRĒ-SG
:%^StodRMē        SG-DAT_n ;
:%^StodRMē        SG-ELA/INE_st ;
:%^StodRMē        SG-GEN ;
:%{XC%}%>õ    SG-ILL_ZERO ;
:%^StodRMē        SG-INS_ks ;
:%^StodRMē        SG-NOM  ;
:%{XC%}%>õ    SG-PAR_ZERO ;

LEXICON NMN_IRĒ-PL
:%^StodRMē        PL-INS_DÕKS-STEM ;
:%^PalatalizeLeft        PL-ELA/INE_šti ;
:%^PalatalizeLeft        PL-ILL_ži ;
:%^PalatalizeLeft        PL-PAR_ḑi ;

!! 19
LEXICON NMN_TUBĀ !!≈ * **@CODE@** tubā:tuʼb
!! * Yaml: **A-amaa, N-tubaa** Pass: 2014.12.12
!! Stem change:	 Yes
!!   Vowel change in word-final position a:õ/0
!! Stød
 NMN_TUBĀ-SG ;
 NMN_TUBĀ-PL ;
LEXICON NMN_TUBĀ-SG
:%^StodRMā        SG-DAT_n ;
:%^StodRMā        SG-ELA/INE_st ;
:%^StodRMā        SG-GEN ;
:%{XC%}%>õ    SG-ILL_ZERO ;
:%^StodRMā        SG-INS_ks ;
:%^StodRMā        SG-NOM  ;
:%{XC%}%>õ    SG-PAR_ZERO ;
