src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON nouns
agānd+N:agān N_TIDĀR-PL  "akanat" ;
abbõnd+N:aʼbbõn N_AʼBBÕNZ-PL  "parta" ;
abbõnz+N:aʼbbõn N_AʼBBÕNZ  "partakarva" ;
bokāabbõnd+N:bokā#aʼbbõn N_AʼBBÕNZ-PL  "poskiparta" ;
bäbbõrz+N:bäʼbbõr N_AŅGÕRZ  "kääpiö" ;
bōgõn+N:bōgõn N_APPÕN  "viulun jousi" ;
būndal+N:būndal N_PĒGAL  "voiastia" ;
delvõrz+N:delvõr N_KAʼGGÕRZ  "vallaton" ;
dinniņd+N:diʼnniņ N_ǬʼBIĻ-PL  "ohimo" ;
eksõld+N:eksõl N_APPÕN-PL  "silppu" ;
elektõraņgõrz+N:elektõr#aņgõrz N_KAʼGGÕRZ  "sähköankerias" ;
elektõrgitār+N:elektõr#gitār N_TIDĀR  "sähkökitara" ;
elvātõr+N:eʼlvātõr N_BÄʼZMÕR  "elevaattori" ;
golātõks+N:golātõks N_GOLĀTÕKS  "lirinä" ;
granātumārz+N:granāt#umār N_UMĀRZ  "granaattiomena" ;
gräpīļd+N:gräpīļ N_TARĪĻ-PL  "räkä" ;
hlōrappõn+N:hlōr#appõn N_APPÕN  "kloorihappo" ;
jougbūmbal+N:joʼug#būmbal N_PĒGAL  "ulpukka" ;
jōņnaggõrd+N:jǭņ#naʼggõr N_AŅGÕRZ-PL  "varhaisperuna" ;
kalendār+N:kalendār N_TIDĀR  "kalenteri" ;
katōļ+N:katōļ N_TARĪĻ  "katolilainen" ;
kašīdsīezõr+N:kašīd#sīezõr N_KĪNDÕR  "kissankirppu" ;
kaddõn+N:kaʼddõn N_ǬʼRÕN  "vainaja" ;
kieddõr+N:kieʼddõr N_BÄʼZMÕR  "värttinä" ;
kikabbõnd+N:kik#aʼbbõn N_AʼBBÕNZ-PL  "kukonheltta" ;
kilāvagāŗ+N:kilā#vagār N_VAGĀŖ  "kylän pehtoori" ;
kitšāabbõnd+N:kitšā#aʼbbõnd N_AʼBBÕNZ  "pukinparta" ;
klapārd+N:klapār N_TIDĀR-PL  "" ;
knoušõļ+N:knoušõļ N_VIRPÕĻ  "hyttynen" ;
koppiļ+N:koppiļ N_ĀNKAŖ  "turskaonki" ;
koggõrz+N:koʼggõr N_AŅGÕRZ  "ruutana" ;
krõmšõl+N:krõmšõl N_APPÕN  "rystynen" ;
krūopõļ+N:krūopõļ N_VIRPÕĻ  "vammainen" ;
kuŗētsepīļ+N:kuŗē#tsepīļ N_TARĪĻ  "" ;
kūldakōzgõnd+N:kūlda#kǭzgõn N_APPÕN-PL  "kultahäät" ;
kūolõndōrõnd+N:kūolõnd#ǭʼrõn N_BÄʼZMÕR-PL  "ruumisvaatteet" ;
laidõrz+N:laidõr N_KAʼGGÕRZ  "karjapiha" ;
lamātõkspaggõl+N:lamātõks#paʼggõl N_ǬʼRÕN  "ansa" ;
līednaggõrz+N:līʼed#naʼggõr N_AŅGÕRZ  "nauris" ;
lūozber+N:lūozber N_KĪNDÕR  "laakeri" ;
miednädīļd+N:mieʼd#nädīļ N_TARĪĻ-PL  "kuherruskuukausi" ;
minerālappõn+N:minerāl#appõn N_APPÕN  "mineraalihappo" ;
mužīņ+N:mužīņ N_TARĪĻ  "pusu" ;
mägnugār+N:mäʼg#nugār N_TIDĀR  "harjanne" ;
mõtsāsōmal+N:mõtsā#sǭmal N_PĒGAL  "metsäsammal" ;
mīedōrõnd+N:mīʼed#ǭʼrõnd N_BÄʼZMÕR  "miesten vaatteet" ;
nanāōrõn+N:nanā#ǭʼrõn N_ǬʼRÕN  "nenäliina" ;
nōskiļ+N:nǭskiļ N_ĀNKAŖ  "naskali" ;
pakkõld+N:pakkõl N_APPÕN-PL  "tappurat" ;
paḑāōrõn+N:paḑā#ǭʼrõn N_ǬʼRÕN  "tyynyliina" ;
peppiņd+N:peppiņ N_ĀNKAŖ-PL  "kuumasavustettu kala" ;
piezōrõnd+N:pieʼz#ǭʼrõn N_ǬʼRÕN-PL  "pyykki" ;
pippõr+N:pippõr N_KĪNDÕR  "pippuri" ;
põddõrz+N:põʼddõr N_AŅGÕRZ  "hirvi" ;
pūtiļ+N:pūʼtiļ N_ǬʼBIĻ  "talkkuna" ;
pǟgiņž+N:pǟgiņ N_PǞGIŅŽ  "paljous" ;
rakkõrz+N:rakkõr N_KAʼGGÕRZ  "nylkijä" ;
rattiņd+N:rattiņ N_ĀNKAŖ-PL  "rukki" ;
ragdõsumāŗ+N:raʼgdõ#sumāŗ N_TARĪĻ  "rae" ;
rovōrõnd+N:roʼv#ǭʼrõn N_ǬʼRÕN-PL  "kansallispuku" ;
rāndaōbiļ+N:rānda#ǭʼbiļ N_ǬʼBIĻ  "masmalo" ;
rēdõr+N:rēʼdõr N_BÄʼZMÕR  "laivanvarustaja" ;
sigānaggõrd+N:sigā#naʼggõr N_AŅGÕRZ-PL  "sianperunat" ;
siktār+N:siktār N_TIDĀR  "sihteeri" ;
sižgõnd+N:siʼžgõn N_ǬʼRÕN-PL  "sisäelimet" ;
sportmēstar+N:sport#mēstar N_PĒGAL  "mestariurheilija" ;
sõvteātõr+N:sõʼv#teātõr N_KĪNDÕR  "kesäteatteri" ;
sēmḑaabbõnd+N:sēmḑa#aʼbbõn N_AʼBBÕNZ-PL  "maitoparta" ;
sīekõld+N:sīekõl N_APPÕN-PL  "sylki" ;
sūrēviļ+N:sūr#ēviļ N_ĀNKAŖ  "härkähöylä" ;
sūōrõn+N:sū#ǭʼrõn N_ǬʼRÕN  "servietti" ;
sōtõn+N:sǭtõn N_APPÕN  "saatana" ;
tabārd+N:tabār N_TIDĀR-PL  "kalan pyrstö" ;
tarīļ+N:tarīļ N_TARĪĻ  "lautanen" ;
tsidōnijumārz+N:tsidōnij#umār N_UMĀRZ  "kvitteni" ;
tūlkaggõrz+N:tūl#kaʼggõr N_AŅGÕRZ  "hukkakaura" ;
umārz+N:umār N_UMĀRZ  "omena" ;
vagāŗ+N:vagār N_VAGĀŖ  "pehtori" ;
vabbiļ+N:vaʼbbiļ N_ǬʼBIĻ  "ovenkahva" ;
virpõļ+N:virpõļ N_VIRPÕĻ  "arpakuutio" ;
vērzõld+N:vērzõl N_APPÕN-PL  "" ;
vīndal+N:vīndal N_PĒGAL  "vintilä" ;
vīviļd+N:vīviļ N_ĀNKAŖ-PL  "ähky" ;
vōdõr+N:vǭʼdõr N_BÄʼZMÕR  "vaahtera" ;
zubār+N:zubār N_TIDĀR  "tuulenpesä" ;
zōkõr+N:zǭkõr N_KĪNDÕR  "naara" ;
āibald+N:āibal N_PĒGAL-PL  "sylki" ;
ēdrõmkukkõrz+N:ēdrõm#kukkõr N_KAʼGGÕRZ  "kukannuppu" ;
ērgiļd+N:ērgiļ N_ĀNKAŖ-PL  "revontulet" ;
ēviļ+N:ēviļ N_ĀNKAŖ  "höylä" ;
ōbiļ+N:ǭʼbiļ N_ǬʼBIĻ  "masmalo" ;
ōrõnd+N:ǭʼrõn N_BÄʼZMÕR-PL  "vaatteet" ;
